Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2,146
Articles of entity conversion.

(MBCA 9.53) (a) After
the conversion of a domestic business corporation to a domestic unincorporated
entity has been adopted and approved as required by the Nebraska Model Business
Corporation Act, articles of entity conversion shall be signed on behalf of
the corporation by any officer or other duly authorized representative. The
articles shall:

(1) Set forth the name
of the corporation immediately before the filing of the articles of entity
conversion and the name to which the name of the corporation is to be changed,
which shall be a name that satisfies the organic law of the surviving entity;

(2) State the type of
unincorporated entity that the surviving entity will be;

(3) Set forth a statement
that the plan of entity conversion was duly approved by the shareholders in
the manner required by the act and the articles of incorporation; and

(4) If the surviving
entity is a filing entity, either contain all of the provisions required to
be set forth in its public organic document and any other desired provisions
that are permitted or have attached a public organic document; except that,
in either case, provisions that would not be required to be included in a
restated public organic document may be omitted.

(b) After the conversion of a domestic
unincorporated entity to a domestic business corporation has been adopted
and approved as required by the organic law of the unincorporated entity,
articles of entity conversion shall be signed on behalf of the unincorporated
entity by any officer or other duly authorized representative. The articles
shall:

(1)
Set forth the name of the unincorporated entity immediately before the filing
of the articles of entity conversion and the name to which the name of the
unincorporated entity is to be changed which shall be a name that satisfies
the requirements of section 21-230;

(2) Set forth a statement that the plan of entity
conversion was duly approved in accordance with the organic law of the unincorporated
entity; and

(3)
Either contain all of the provisions that subsection (a) of section 21-220
requires to be set forth in articles of incorporation and any other desired
provisions that subsection (b) of section 21-220 permits to be included in
articles of incorporation or have attached articles of incorporation; except
that, in either case, provisions that would not be required to be included
in restated articles of incorporation of a domestic business corporation may
be omitted.

(c)
After the conversion of a foreign unincorporated entity to a domestic business
corporation has been authorized as required by the laws of the foreign jurisdiction,
articles of entity conversion shall be signed on behalf of the foreign unincorporated
entity by any officer or other duly authorized representative. The articles
shall:

(1)
Set forth the name of the unincorporated entity immediately before the filing
of the articles of entity conversion and the name to which the name of the
unincorporated entity is to be changed which shall be a name that satisfies
the requirements of section 21-230;

(2) Set forth the jurisdiction under the laws of which
the unincorporated entity was organized immediately before the filing of the
articles of entity conversion and the date on which the unincorporated entity
was organized in that jurisdiction;

(3) Set forth a statement that the conversion of the
unincorporated entity was duly approved in the manner required by its organic
law; and

(4)
Either contain all of the provisions that subsection (a) of section 21-220
requires to be set forth in articles of incorporation and any other desired
provisions that subsection (b) of section 21-220 permits to be included in
articles of incorporation or have attached articles of incorporation; except
that, in either case, provisions that would not be required to be included
in restated articles of incorporation of a domestic business corporation may
be omitted.

(d)
The articles of entity conversion shall be delivered to the Secretary of State
for filing and shall take effect at the effective time provided in section
21-206. Articles of entity conversion under subsection (a) or (b) of this
section may be combined with any required conversion filing under the organic
law of the domestic unincorporated entity if the combined filing satisfies
the requirements of both this section and the other organic law.

(e) If the converting
entity is a foreign unincorporated entity that is authorized to transact business
in this state under a provision of law similar to sections 21-2,203 to 21-2,220,
its certificate of authority or other type of foreign qualification shall
be canceled automatically on the effective date of its conversion.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 146.
January 1, 2016